Washington statutes.
RCW 24.60.020

Request for assistance—Conditions.

A member jurisdiction may request assistance from other member jurisdictions to respond to, mitigate, or recover from a building safety emergency, or for participation of other member jurisdictions in authorized drills or exercises, subject to the following provisions:

(1) A member jurisdiction requesting assistance under the intrastate building safety mutual aid system must (a) be experiencing a building safety emergency as defined in RCW 24.60.010 or (b) anticipate undertaking drills or exercises.

(2) The chief executive officer of a requesting member jurisdiction, or his or her authorized designee, must request assistance under the intrastate building safety mutual aid system directly from the chief executive officer of another member jurisdiction.

(3) A verbal request for assistance must be confirmed by a written request as soon as practicable.

(4) A responding member jurisdiction may withhold requested resources for any reason.

(5) Emergency responders from a responding member jurisdiction are under the general command of the responding member jurisdiction and the operational control of the requesting member jurisdiction. All emergency intrastate building safety mutual aid system responders shall work within the infrastructure of any established incident command system as defined in RCW 38.52.010.

(6) Resources from a responding member jurisdiction are under the command of the responding member jurisdiction and the operational control of the requesting member jurisdiction.

(7) Response under this agreement is voluntary. Unless otherwise provided by this section, a requesting member jurisdiction shall reimburse responding member jurisdictions for the true and full value of assistance provided pursuant to the intrastate building safety mutual aid system. Requests for reimbursement must be made within thirty days in accordance with procedures and rates developed by the *intrastate building safety mutual aid oversight committee.

(8) If not otherwise prohibited, a responding member jurisdiction may donate requested emergency responder assistance and resources to a requesting member jurisdiction.

[ 2011 c 215 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: 2011 c 215 s 10, creating the oversight committee, was vetoed.